apertium-pl-sk.sk.dix
    <pardef n="vi/dieť__vblex">
      <e>
         <p>
          <l>dieť</l>
          <r>dieť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dím</l>
          <r>dieť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>díš</l>
          <r>dieť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dí</l>
          <r>dieť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>díme</l>
          <r>dieť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>díte</l>
          <r>dieť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dia</l>
          <r>dieť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>del</l>
          <r>dieť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dela</l>
          <r>dieť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>delo</l>
          <r>dieť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>deli</l>
          <r>dieť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ď</l>
          <r>dieť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ďme</l>
          <r>dieť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ďte</l>
          <r>dieť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>den</l>
          <r>dieť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__bytie"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>den</l>
          <r>dieť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="psv"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__abstraktný"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>deno</l>
          <r>dieť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diac</l>
          <r>dieť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diac</l>
          <r>dieť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="act"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__súci"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="st/áť__vblex">
      <e>
         <p>
          <l>áť</l>
          <r>áť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ojím</l>
          <r>áť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ojíš</l>
          <r>áť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ojí</l>
          <r>áť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ojíme</l>
          <r>áť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ojíte</l>
          <r>áť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oja</l>
          <r>áť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ál</l>
          <r>dieť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ála</l>
          <r>áť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>álo</l>
          <r>áť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>áli</l>
          <r>áť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oj</l>
          <r>áť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ojme</l>
          <r>áť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ojte</l>
          <r>áť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>át</l>
          <r>áť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__bytie"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>án</l>
          <r>áť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="psv"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__abstraktný"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>áno</l>
          <r>áť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ojac</l>
          <r>áť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ojac</l>
          <r>áť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="act"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__súci"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="vidieť"><par n="ne+"/><i>vi</i><par n="vi/dieť__vblex"/></e>
